Idaho statutes. Title 56 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND WELFARE
Chapter 3
COUNTY COUNCILS OF PUBLIC ASSISTANCE

Sec.

§ 56-301. County council of public assistance — Appointment of members — Term — Organization.

There is hereby created in each county of this state a council to be known as County Council of Public Assistance. Said council shall consist of five (5) members to be appointed as follows: one (1) member to be a county commissioner to be selected and appointed by the board of county commissioners of his county and to serve at the pleasure of the board of county commissioners, but under such appointment to serve only while he is a county commissioner; four (4) members of the council to be appointed by the governor, not more than two (2) of whom shall be members of the same political faith. The members appointed by the governor shall be for the following terms: one (1) member for one (1) year; one (1) for two (2) years; and two (2) for three (3) years. All appointments by the governor after the first board shall be for a term of three (3) years. Each member so appointed shall serve until his successor is appointed and qualifies and shall receive no compensation for his services. In the event of a vacancy, except as to the member appointed by the board of county commissioners, the same shall be filled by appointment of the governor, which appointee shall be of the same political faith as his predecessor. The appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for the unexpired term of his predecessor. The council shall organize by the election of a chairman and the county supervisor of public assistance shall be the secretary of said council.

§ 56-302. Meetings — Quorum.

The council shall meet in regular session at least once each month at a time and place within the county to be fixed by resolution of the council. Special meetings may be had at any time upon call of the chairman and notice thereof given by the secretary to the members of the said council. The time and method of giving such notice of special meetings shall be fixed by resolution of the council. A quorum of said council shall consist of three (3) members and a quorum at any meeting legally called may exercise all the powers vested in the council.

§ 56-303. Powers and duties.

The county council of public assistance shall review, in accordance with plans, rules and regulations approved by the board of health and welfare of the state of Idaho, the administration of public assistance and social services of the state department of health and welfare in the several counties. In the performance of its duties said council shall:

Make periodic reviews of all cases approved for public assistance within the county, for the purpose of determining the continuing eligibility for public assistance of the recipient.

Review all cases heretofore approved for public assistance within the county by the department for the purpose of determining the continuing eligibility of the recipient in regard thereto.

Furnish information to applicants and the public in general, as to who is eligible for public assistance, and the rules and regulations promulgated by the board in regard thereto, to the end that there may be more widespread knowledge of the real purpose of the public assistance program and the administration thereof.

To recommend to the board such rules, regulations, policies and procedure, as in the judgment of the council, shall increase efficiency, effect economy and generally improve the administration of public assistance.

The board shall promulgate all necessary and proper rules and regulations governing the procedure of the county council of public assistance.

Nothing herein is intended, nor shall be interpreted, to prevent the right of appeal or limit opportunity for a fair hearing before the board; nor as preventing the director of the department of health and welfare from administering the public assistance laws of this state as a single state agency.